District of Columbia statutes.
31-3707

Notice of free examination.

Medicare supplement policies and certificates shall have a notice prominently printed on the 1st page of the policy or certificate, or attached thereto, stating in substance that the applicant shall have the right to return the policy or certificate within 30 days of its delivery and to have the premium refunded if, after examination of the policy or certificate, the applicant is not satisfied for any reason. Any refund made pursuant to this section shall be paid directly to the applicant by the issuer in a timely manner.

Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-170, § 8, 39 DCR 5825
1981 Ed., § 35-2617.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3701.